src/fst/test/gt-norm2-yamls/V-II-mihkwâw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mihkwâw - help : # Wolvengrey VIIv:


     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Sg:  mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+3Pl:  mihkwâwa
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Sg:  mihkwâyiw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+4Pl:  mihkwâyiwa
     
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-mihkwâk]
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-mihkwâki]
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: [ê-mihkwâyik]
     PV/ê+mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: [ê-mihkwâyiki]
     
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg:  mihkwâki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl:  mihkwâkwâwi
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg:  mihkwâyiki
     mihkwâw+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl:  mihkwâyikwâwi
